Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB337.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 15.808 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) By applying for Title IV-D services or accepting public assistance for or on
behalf of a needy dependent child, the recipient shall be deemed to have made
an assignment to the office of the right to any child support or maintenance
owed up to the amount of public assistance paid by the Office of the Attorney
General to the recipient.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, to the extent funds are
available, the first one hundred dollars ($100) of child support collected per
month for one (1) child or the first two hundred dollars ($200) of child
support collected per month for two (2) or more children shall:
1. Pass through to the recipient; and
2. Not be considered income for the purpose of determining eligibility
for, or the recipient monthly benefit amount of, public assistance
under Title IV-A of the Social Security Act.
(c) The office shall be subrogated to the right of the child or the person having
custody to collect and receive all child support payments and to initiate any
support action existing under the laws of this state.
(2) The Office of the Attorney General shall distribute all child support payments and
assigned arrearages as required by 42 U.S.C. sec. 651 et seq.
(3) When Title IV-D services on behalf of a dependent child are terminated, current
and past due court-ordered or administratively determined child support owed the
child shall be payable to the physical custodian of the dependent child for the period
of time the dependent child was in the physical custody of that custodian.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/1/2026 11:12 AM Jacketed